es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Ráquetbol y squash > Ayudas para el entrenamiento de ráquetbol y squash > Bolsas de entrenamiento de ráquetbol y squash: Raqueteros de racquetball y squash; Fundas para raquetas de racquetball y squash
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Racquetball og squash > Racquetball og squash – træningshjælpemidler > Racquetball og squash – tasker: Ketchertasker til racquetball og squash; Ketcheretuier til racquetball og squash
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > แร็กเกตบอลและสควอช > อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกซ้อมแร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช > กระเป๋าฝึกซ้อมแร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช: กระเป๋าไม้แร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช; ปลอกไม้แร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Raketbolas ir skvošas > Raketbolo ir skvošo treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės > Raketbolo ir skvošo treniruočių krepšiai: Raketbolo ir skvošo rakečių krepšiai; Raketbolo ir skvošo rakečių dėklai
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Reketbol i skvoš > Pomagala za trening za reketbol i skvoš > Torbe za trening za reketbol i skvoš: Torbe za rekete za reketbol i skvoš; Navlake za rekete za reketbol i skvoš
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Raketbal a squash > Tréninkové pomůcky na squash a raketbal > Tréninkové tašky na squash a raketbal: Tašky na rakety na racquetball a squash; Obaly na rakety na racquetball a squash
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Racquetball en squash > Squash- en racquetballtrainingshulpmiddelen > Squash- en racquetballtrainingszakken: Racquetball- en squashrackettassen; Racquetball- en squashrackethoezen
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Racquetball & Squash > Racquetball & Squash Training Aids > Racquetball & Squash Training Bags: Racquetball & Squash Racket Bags; Racquetball & Squash Racket Covers
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Racquetball ve Squash > Racquetball ve Squash Eğitim Araçları > Racquetball ve Squash Antrenman Çantaları: Raketbol ve squash raketi çantaları; Raketbol ve squash raketi kılıfları
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Racquetball ja squash > Racquetball- ja squash-harjoitteluvälineet > Racquetball- ja squash-harjoittelusäkit: Racquetball- ja squash-mailakassit; Racquetball- ja squash-mailojen suojukset
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Racquetball in skvoš > Pripomočki za vadbo racquetballa in skvoša > Športne torbe za racquetball in skvoš: Racquetball in skvoš Vreče za loparje; Racquetball in skvoš Pokrivala za loparje
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng quần > Dụng cụ hỗ trợ luyện tập Racquetball & Squash > Túi đựng đồ luyện tập Racquetball & Squash: Túi đựng vợt Racquetball & bóng quần; Bao vợt Racquetball & bóng quần
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Racquetball și squash > Articole antrenament de racquetball și squash > Saci antrenament pentru racquetball și squash: Genți pentru rachete de racquetball și squash; Huse pentru rachete de racquetball și squash
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Racquetball & Squash > Racquetball- & Squash-Trainingshilfen > Racquetball- & Squash-Trainingstaschen: Racquetball- & Squashschlägertaschen; Racquetball- & Squashschlägerhüllen
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Racquetball i squash > Pomoce treningowe do racquetballa i squasha > Torby treningowe do racquetballa i squasha: Torby na rakiety do racquetballa i squasha; Pokrowce na rakiety do racquetballa i squasha
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Racketboll och squash > Träningshjälpmedel för racketboll och squash > Träningsväskor för racketboll och squash: Racketväskor för racquetball och squash; Racketfodral för racquetball och squash
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Squash e raquetebol > Auxiliares de treino para raquetebol e squash > Sacos de treino para raquetebol e squash: Sacos para raquetes de raquetebol e squash; Capas para raquetes de raquetebol e squash
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 라켓볼/스쿼시 > 라켓볼/스쿼시 훈련 장비 > 라켓볼/스쿼시 트레이닝 가방: 라켓볼 및 스쿼시 라켓 가방; 라켓볼 및 스쿼시 라켓 커버
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 短网拍墙球/壁球 > 墙球/壁球训练辅助用品 > 墙球/壁球训练包: 墙球与壁球拍包; 墙球与壁球拍套
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Ρακέτα και σκουός > Βοηθήματα προπόνησης ρακέτας & σκουός > Τσάντες προπόνησης ρακέτας & σκουός: Τσάντες ρακετών ράκετμπολ και σκουός; Καλύμματα ρακετών ράκετμπολ και σκουός
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Racquetball e squash > Ausili per l'allenamento di racquetball e squash > Borse da allenamento per racquetball e squash: Borse per racchette da racquetball e squash; Foderi per racchette da racquetball e squash
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 短柄牆球/壁球 > 短柄牆球和壁球訓練輔助工具 > 短柄牆球和壁球訓練包: 短柄牆球與壁球拍袋; 短柄牆球與壁球拍套
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Ракетбол и сквош > Тренировочный инвентарь для ракетбола и сквоша > Сумки для тренировок по ракетболу и сквошу: Сумки для ракеток для ракетбола и сквоша; Чехлы для ракеток для ракетбола и сквоша
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Raketbal a squash > Raketbalové a squashové tréningové pomôcky > Tréningové tašky na raketbal a squash: Vaky na raketbalové a squashové rakety; Obaly na raketbalové a squashové rakety
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Raquetebol e squash > Auxiliares de treinamento de raquetebol e squash > Bolsas de treinamento para raquetebol e squash: Bolsas para raquetes de raquetebol e squash; Capas para raquetes de raquetebol e squash
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > スカッシュ・ラケットボール > スカッシュ・ラケットボール練習器具 > スカッシュ・ラケットボール用トレーニングバッグ: ラケットボール・スカッシュ用ラケットバッグ; ラケットボール・スカッシュ用ラケットカバー
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Racquetball et squash > Aides à l’entraînement au racquetball et au squash > Sacs d’entraînement pour racquetball et squash: Sacs de raquette de squash et de racquetball; Housses de raquette de squash et de racquetball
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Raketball és squash > Raketball és squash edzési segédeszközök > Raketball és squash edzőtáskák: Racquetball- és squashütő-táskák; Racquetball- és squashütő-tokok
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Ракетбол и скуош > Помощни средства за ракетбол и скуош > Чанти за тренировки по ракетбол и скуош: Чанти за ракети за ракетбол и тенис; Калъфи за ракети за ракетбол и тенис
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Racquetball og squash > Treningshjelpemidler for racquetball og squash > Treningssekker for racquetball og squash: Racketbager for racquetball og squash; Rackettrekk for racquetball og squash